Mississippi, session 2026, HB378.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  It is unlawful for any business that makes an automatic renewal offer or continuous service offer to a consumer in this state to do any of the following: (a)  Fail to present the automatic renewal offer terms or continuous service offer terms in a clear and conspicuous manner and in visual proximity, or, in the case of an offer conveyed by voice, in temporal proximity, to the request for consent to the offer before the subscription or purchasing agreement is fulfilled.  If the offer also includes a free gift or trial, the offer must include a clear and conspicuous explanation of the price that will be charged after the trial ends or the manner in which the subscription or purchasing agreement pricing will change upon conclusion of the trial; (b)  Charge the consumer's credit or debit card, or the consumer's account with a third party, for an automatic renewal or continuous service without first obtaining the consumer's affirmative consent to the agreement containing the automatic renewal offer terms or continuous service offer terms, including the terms of an automatic renewal offer or continuous service offer that is made at a promotional or discounted price for a limited period of time; (c)  Fail to provide an acknowledgment that includes the automatic renewal offer terms or continuous service offer terms, cancellation policy, and information regarding how to cancel in a manner that is capable of being retained by the consumer.  If the automatic renewal offer or continuous service offer includes a free gift or trial, the business shall also disclose in the acknowledgment how to cancel, and allow the consumer to cancel, the automatic renewal or continuous service before the consumer pays for the goods or services; (d)  Fail to provide a consumer with a notice, as may be required by subsection (2) of this section, that clearly and conspicuously states and includes all of the following: (i)  That the automatic renewal or continuous service will automatically renew unless the consumer cancels; (ii)  The length and any additional terms of the renewal period; (iii)  One or more methods by which a consumer can cancel the automatic renewal or continuous service; (iv)  If the notice is sent electronically, either a link that directs the consumer to the cancellation process, or another reasonably accessible electronic method that directs the consumer to the cancellation process if no link exists; and (v)  Contact information for the business. (2)  A business shall provide a consumer with a notice as specified in subsection (1)(d) of this section if either of the following is true, provided that if an automatic renewal offer or a continuous service offer requires a notice under both paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, only the notice specified in paragraph (b) shall be required: (a)  The consumer accepted a free gift or trial, lasting for more than thirty-one (31) days, that was included in an automatic renewal offer or continuous service offer; or the consumer accepted an automatic renewal offer or continuous service offer at a promotional or discounted price, and the applicability of that price was more than thirty-one (31) days. (i)  In this case, the notice must be provided at least three (3) days but not more than twenty-one (21) days before the expiration of the predetermined period of time for which the free gift or trial, or promotional or discounted price, applies. (ii)  An offer shall be exempt from the requirements of this paragraph (a) if the consumer does not enter into the contract electronically and the business has not collected or maintained the consumer's valid email address, phone number, or another means of notifying the consumer electronically. (iii)  For purposes of this paragraph, "free gift" does not include a free promotional item or gift given by the business that differs from the subscribed product; or (b)  The consumer accepted an automatic renewal offer or continuous service offer with an initial term of one (1) year or longer that automatically renews unless the consumer cancels the automatic renewal or continuous service.  In this case, the notice must be provided at least fifteen (15) days but not more than forty-five (45) days before the automatic renewal offer or continuous service offer renews. (3)  A business that makes an automatic renewal offer or continuous service offer shall provide a toll-free telephone number, electronic mail address, a postal address if the seller directly bills the consumer, or another cost-effective, timely and easy-to-use mechanism for cancellation, which must be described in the acknowledgment specified in subsection (1)(c) of this section. (4)  (a)  In addition to the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, a business that allows a consumer to accept an automatic renewal offer or continuous service offer online shall allow a consumer to terminate the automatic renewal or continuous service exclusively online, at will, and without engaging in any further steps that obstruct or delay the consumer's ability to terminate the automatic renewal or continuous service immediately.  The business shall provide a method of termination that is online in the form of either of the following: (i)  A prominently located direct link or button, which may be located within either a customer account or profile, or within either device or user settings; or (ii)  An immediately accessible termination email formatted and provided by the business that a consumer can send to the business without additional information. (b)  The termination requirements of this subsection (4) apply to the automatic renewal terms and continuous service terms of the contract, and the remaining provisions of the contract continue to be governed by all applicable laws and regulations. (c)  Notwithstanding paragraph (a), of this subsection (4), a business may require a consumer to enter account information or otherwise authenticate online before termination of the automatic renewal or continuous service online if the consumer has an account with the business.  A consumer who is unwilling or unable to enter account information or otherwise authenticate online before termination of the automatic renewal or continuous service online shall not be precluded from authenticating or terminating the automatic renewal or continuous service offline using another method pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. (5)  If there is a material change in the terms of the automatic renewal or continuous service that has been accepted by a consumer in this state, the business shall provide the consumer with a clear and conspicuous notice of the material change and provide information regarding how to cancel in a manner that is capable of being retained by the consumer. (6)  The requirements of this act must be fulfilled before the completion of the initial order for the automatic renewal or continuous service, except as follows: (a)  The requirements of subsection (1)(c) and (d) of this section may be fulfilled after completion of the initial order. (b)  The requirements of subsection (2) of this section may be fulfilled after completion of the initial order. (c)  The requirement of subsection (5) of this section must be fulfilled before implementation of the material change. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.